pl: Typ drążka okiennego: Do wykuszu; Karnisz café; Narożne; Dekoracyjne; Podwójne; Magnetyczne; Karnisz do okna skrzynkowego; Pojedyncze; Sprężynowe; Rozporowe; Karnisz przesuwny; Obejmujące; Inne
en: Window rod type: Bay window; Cafe; Corner; Decorative; Double; Magnetic; Sash; Single; Spring; Tension; Traverse; Wrap-around; Other
zh-CN: 窗杆类型: 飘窗杆; 咖啡杆; 转角杆; 装饰杆; 双杆; 磁吸杆; 窗扇杆; 单杆; 弹簧杆; 张力杆; 滑轨杆; 环绕杆; 其他
de: Fensterstangentyp: Erkerfenster; Cafe; Ecke; Dekorativ; Doppel; Magnetisch; Schärpe; Einzel; Frühling; Spannung; Traverse; Umwickelnd; Sonstiges
da: Vinduesstangtype: Karnap; Cafe; Hjørne; Dekorativ; Dobbelt; Magnetisk; Ramme; Enkelt; Fjeder; Spænding; Traverse; Wrap-around; Andet
tr: Perde çubuğu tipi: Cumba; Kafe; Köşe; Dekoratif; Çift; Mıknatıslı; Kanat; Tek; Yaylı; Gergili; Raylı; Sarmalı; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de varão para janela: Janela saliente; Café; Canto; Decorativo; Duplo; Magnético; Guilhotina; Único; Mola; Tensão; Transversal; Envolvente; Outro
ro-RO: Tip de baghetă pentru perdea: Bovindou; Tip cafenea; De colț; Decorativ; Dublu; Magnetic; Canat; Simplu; Cu arc; Tensiune; Transversal; Înfășurabil; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta okenske palice: Izbočeno okno; Kavarna; Kotna; Dekorativna; Dvojni; Magnetno; Pas; Enojni; Vzmetna, fleksibilna; Napetost; Prečkanje; Ovijalni; Druga
zh-TW: 窗簾桿類型: 凸窗; 輕質; 角落; 裝飾; 雙倍; 磁性; 伸縮; 單倍; 彈簧; 張力; 橫穿; 環繞式; 其他
nl: Type gordijnroede: Erkerraam; Caféroede; Hoek; Decoratief; Dubbel; Magnetisch; Vitrillestang; Enkel; Veer; Spanning; Railroede; Omwikkelbaar; Overig
vi: Loại thanh treo rèm cửa sổ: Cửa sổ lồi; Kiểu cafe; Góc; Trang trí; Gấp đôi; Từ tính; Khung cửa; Đơn; Lò xo; Độ căng; Thanh treo rèm có dây kéo; Quấn quanh; Khác
lt-LT: Langų karnizo tipas: Išsikišęs langas; Kavinė; Kampinis; Dekoratyvinis; Dvigubas; Magnetinis; Juosta; Vienas; Spyruoklinis; Įtempimas; Perstūmiamas; Apvyniojamas; Kita
bg-BG: Тип корниз за прозорец: Еркерен прозорец; Тънко; Ъгъл; Декоративно; Двойно; Магнитно; За отваряемо крило на прозорец; Единично; Пружина; Опън; Траверс; Обвиващо; Друго
ru: Тип оконного карниза: Для эркерного окна; Кафе; Угловой; Декоративный; Двойной; Магнитный; Пояс; Одинарный; Пружинный; Распорный; Раздвижной; С поворотом к стене; Другое
fr: Type de tringle à rideaux: Baie vitrée; Café; Coin; Décoratif; Double; Magnétique; Pour fenêtre à guillotine; Unique; Printemps; Tension; À tirage; Enveloppant; Autre
el: Τύπος κουρτινόξυλου: Για προεξέχον παράθυρο; Καφενείο; Γωνιακό; Διακοσμητικό; Διπλό; Μαγνητικό; Ζώνη; Μονό; Ελατηρίου; Τάσης; Διασχίζω; Περιμετρικό; Άλλο
fi: Ikkunatangon tyyppi: Ulkoneva ikkuna; Kahvila; Kulma; Koristeellinen; Kaksoiskappaleellinen; Magneettinen; Puitetanko; Yksitankoinen; Jousitanko; Kiristystanko; Poikkitanko; Seinään kiertyvä; Muu
ko: 커튼 봉 유형: 돌출창; 카페; 코너형; 장식적인; 더블; 자기식; 새시; 싱글; 봄; 장력; 트래버스; 래프어라운드; 기타
hu: Ablakrúd kialakítása: Kiugró ablakfülke; Kávéházi; Sarok; Díszítő; Dupla; Mágneses; Ablakszárny; Szimpla; Rugós; Feszesség; Átmenő; Körbetekerhető; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta šipke za prozore: Izbočeni prozor; Polovici prozora; Kut; Ukrasni; Dvostruka; Magnet; Prozorski okvir; Jednostruka; S oprugom; Napetost; Klizanje; Omotna; Ostalo
es: Tipo de varilla para ventana: Ventana mirador; Cafe; Esquina; Decorativo; Doble; Magnético; Faja; Individual; Primavera; Tensión; Atravesar; Envolvente; Otros
sk-SK: Typ okennej tyče: Arkierové okno; Záclonová tyč do polovice okna; Rohová; Dekoratívna; Dvojitá; Magnetická; Ľahká záclonová tyč na rám okna; Samostatná; Pružinová; Napínacia; Pojazdová záclonová tyč; Obtáčacia; Iné
pt-BR: Tipo de haste de janela: Janela de sacada; Café; Canto; Decorativo; Duplo; Magnética; Faixa; Único; Primavera; Tensão; Travessia; Envolvente; Outro
th: ประเภทของราวผ้าม่าน: เบย์วินโดว์; แบบคาเฟ่; มุม; ตกแต่ง; แบบคู่; แม่เหล็ก; แบบสายสะพาย; แบบเดี่ยว; แบบสปริง; ความเครียด; แบบรางเลื่อน; พันรอบ; อื่นๆ
sv: Typ av fönsterstång: Burspråk; Kafé; Hörn; Dekorativ; Dubbel; Magnetisk; Skärp; Enkel; Vår; Spänning; Korsa; Omlindning; Annat
ja: ウィンドウロッドの種類: 張り出し窓; カフェ; コーナー; 装飾; ダブル; マグネット式; サッシ; シングル; スプリング式; テンション式; トラバース; 巻き付け式; その他
it: Tipo di asta da finestra: Bovindo; Caffè; Angolo; Decorativo; Doppio; Magnetico; Fascia; Singolo; A molla; A tensione; Attraversare; Avvolgente; Altro
cs: Typ garnýže: Arkýřová okna; Kavárenská; Do rohu; Dekorativní; Dvojité; Magnetické; Výsuvné okno; Jednoduché; Pružinové; Rozpěrné; Kolejnice; Zahnuté (zatemňovací); Jiné
nb: Vindusstangtype: Karnapp; Kafe; Hjørne; Dekorativ; Dobbel; Magnetisk; Skyvevindu; Enkel; Vår; Spenning; Travers; Viklerundt; Annet